Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.600

Public interest to be protected—Establishment of prices prohibited.

The director shall protect the public interest and the interest of all consumers and producers of every agricultural commodity regulated by every marketing agreement and order issued pursuant to this chapter and shall neither take nor authorize any action which shall have for its purpose the establishment or maintenance of prices.

[ 1961 c 256 s 60.]